District of Columbia statutes.
16-504

Additional attachments.

Upon the application of the plaintiff, his agent, or attorney, other attachments founded on the original affidavits may be issued from time to time, to be directed, executed, and returned in the same manner as the original, and without further publication, against a nonresident or absent defendant, and without additional bond, unless required by the court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 545, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-504.
1973 Ed., § 16-504.